en: Blanched roasted hazelnuts, Skinless roasted hazelnuts
es: Avellanas tostadas sin piel
fr: Noisettes grillées émondées
hr: Blanširanih pečenih lješnjaka
it: Nocciole arrostite sbiancate
lt: Kepinti lazdyno riešutai be odelės
nl: Witte gebrande hazelnoten

en: Hazelnut grilled salted
fr: Noisette grillée salée
nl: Hazelnoten (geroosterd en gezouten)

en: Unsalted hazelnuts, Hazelnuts (unsalted)
fr: Noisettes sans sel
nl: Hazelnoten (ongezouten)

en: Macadamia nuts, Macadamia nut
de: Macadamia-Nüsse, Macadamianüsse
es: Nueces de macadamia, Nuez de macadamia
fi: Australianpähkinäöljy, Makadamiapähkinäöljy
fr: Noix de Macadamia
hr: Makadamija orasi
ja: マカダミアナッツ
la: Macadamia
lt: Makadamijos riešutai
nl: Macadamia's
sv: Macadamianötter, macadamianöt

en: Shelled macadamia nuts
es: Nueces de macadamia sin cáscara
fr: Noix de Macadamia décortiquées
hr: Oljušteni orasi makadamije
lt: Gliaudyti makadamijos riešutai
nl: Gepelde macadamia's

en: Grilled and salted Macadamia nut, rilled and salted Macadamia nuts
fr: Noix de macadamia grillée et salée, Noix de macadamia grillées et salées

en: Kola nuts
fr: Noix de cola

en: Peanuts, ground nuts, groundnuts
bg: Фъстъци
ca: Cacauets
da: Jordnødder, Peanuts
de: Erdnüsse
es: Cacahuetes, Cacahuates, Manís
fi: maapähkinät
fr: Cacahuètes, Cacahouètes, Arachides
he: בוטנים
hr: kikiriki
hu: Földimogyoró, Mogyoró
it: Arachidi
ja: ピーナッツ, ラッカセイ, 落花生
la: Arachis hypogaea
lt: Žemės riešutai
nl: Pinda's, Aardnoten
pl: Orzeszki ziemne, Orzeszki arachidowe, Fistaszki
pt: Amendoins, amendoim
ru: Арахис
sv: Jordnötter, jordnöt
tr: Yer fıstığı, Yerfıstığı
zh: 花生

en: Unshelled peanuts
de: ungeschälte Erdnüsse
es: Cacahuetes sin cascara, Maní sin cáscara
fr: Cacahuètes décortiquées
hr: Kikiriki bez ljuske
hu: Nogyoró héjjal, Héjas földimogyoró
lt: Negliaudyti žemės riešutai
nl: Ongepelde pinda's, doppindas, doppinda's

en: Coated peanuts
fr: Cacahuètes enrobées d'un biscuit pour apéritif
hr: Premazani kikiriki
it: Arachidi rivestite
nl: Borrelnootjes

en: Wasabi coated peanuts
nl: Wasabibollen

en: Peanuts cooked in water with salt, Boiled peanuts with salt
fr: Arachides bouillies salées, Arachides cuites à l'eau salée, Cacahuètes bouillies salées, Cacahuètes cuites à l'eau salée

en: Roasted nuts
de: Geröstete Nüsse
es: Frutos de cáscara tostados, Frutos secos tostados
fi: paahdetut pähkinät
fr: Fruits à coque grillés
hr: Prženi orasi
it: Frutta secca tostata
lt: Skrudinti riešutai
nl: Geroosterde noten
pt: Frutos secos torrados
ru: Обжаренные орехи
tr: Kavrulmuş çerezler

en: Roasted peanuts
bg: Печени фъстъци
de: Geröstete Erdnüsse
es: Cacahuetes tostados, Maní tostado
fi: paahdetut maapähkinät
fr: Cacahuètes grillées
hr: Prženi kikiriki
hu: Pörkölt mogyoró
it: Arachidi tostate
lt: Skrudinti žemės riešutai
nl: Gebrande pinda's
pt: Amendoins torrados
tr: Kavrulmuş yer fıstığı, Kavrulmuş yerfıstığı

en: Peanut grilled salted
fr: Cacahuète grillée salée
hr: Kikiriki na žaru slani
nl: Geroosterde gezouten pinda's

en: Pecan nuts, Pecan nut
bg: Пеканов орех
ca: Nou pecana meitat
de: Pekannüsse, Pekannusskerne
es: Nueces pecanas
fr: Noix de pécan
hr: Pekan orasi
it: Noci pecan
ja: ピーカンナッツ, ペカンナッツ, ペカン
la: Carya illinoinensis
lt: Pekano riešutai
nl: Pecannote
pl: Orzechy pekan, Orzechy pekan łuskane
sv: Pekannötter, pekannöt

en: Salted pecan nuts, Salted pecan nut, Pecan nuts (salted)
fr: Noix de pécan salées, Noix de pécan salée

en: Roasted and salted pecan nuts, Pecan nuts (roasted and salted)
es: Nueces pecanas fritas y saladas
fr: Noix de Pécan grillées et salées

en: Plain pecan nuts, Pecan nuts (plain)
de: Pekannüsse(naturbelassen)
es: Nuez pecana natural, nuex pecana cruda
fr: Noix de pécan naturels
nl: Pecannoten (natuurlijk)
pt: Noz pecana natural

en: Pistachios
bg: Шам-фъстък
de: Pistazien
es: Pistachos, pistaches
fi: Pistaasipähkinät, Pistaasit
fr: Pistaches, Pistache
hr: pistacije, pistacija
hu: Pisztácia
id: Pistasio
it: Pistacchi
ja: ピスタチオ
la: Pistacia vera
lt: Pistacijos
lv: pistācijas rieksti
nb: Pistasjnøtter
nl: Pistachenoten
ru: Фисташки
sl: Pistacije
sv: Pistaschnötter, pistaschnöt
th: พิสตาชิโอ
tr: Antep fıstığı
zh: 开心果